Just then, the station appeared in the distance. Lisbell thanked her once more and opened her luggage. Before getting off, she checked her belongings first. Her luggage, which contained a few coins she had earned from trading jewels with black marketers, her mother’s clothes that she had kept inside, and a spare set of clothes, was very simple and, in other words, poor.

 

Lisbell counted her cash obsessively. She was glad that the deal with the black marketer went well. This was also the third time she had made a deal.

 

The black marketer she had contacted the first and second times was furious, saying that she had no idea whether the items were real or fake, and that she should just get out of here and there and not bother with her business today.

 

The third black marketer must have had an eye for jewels, so he looked around and handed over all the cash he had.


Lisbell recruited a few children playing ball in the shade near the historical landmark.

 

She handed them money, including a tip, and asked them to buy train tickets heading to three different destinations. This was to throw off any possible pursuit by Lady Altahart or Ulrich.

 

Not stopping there, she herself moved between distant, lesser-known suburban stations, places even she had never heard of. At each stop, she repeated the process, enlisting more children to purchase tickets to various locations. During the nights, she chose overnight trains where she could rest briefly.

 

This convoluted, evasive journey lasted three full days, ensuring her trail was nearly impossible to follow.

 

Feeling relatively confident she was no longer being tracked, Lisbell finally purchased a ticket to Renbruck.

 

At last, the Kings Morgan Station came into view. Her heart pounded as she realized she had arrived in the city where Theodore lived.

 

She felt the same anticipation as the first time she had left Theodore, boarding a train bound for Marnia and setting everything into motion. Slowly, imperceptibly, everything had changed since then.

 

She wished for the beginning and end to mirror each other.

 

That, by traveling on this train to see Theodore, her connection with Ulrich could finally be severed.

 

A thread, frayed and cut. A breath, exhaled and lost.

 

Her desperate thoughts accompanied her as the train slowed to a stop.

 

Lisbell stepped off awkwardly, setting foot on the soil.

 

‘This is Theodore’s hometown.’

 

Since it was part of Lekem, the lifestyle wasn’t vastly different from the places she had been. Yet, there was a vibrant, bustling energy unique to an emerging industrial city.

 

She looked off into the distance, where tall factory chimneys rose into the sky. Among them, Theodore’s father’s textile factory must be there.

 

Seeing this made her journey feel real. She had truly come to see Theodore.

 

First, Lisbell visited a general store near the plaza to purchase a cloche hat and cape. Being a fugitive of sorts, she couldn’t casually flaunt her appearance. Thankfully, the city catered to a bourgeois crowd, and the prices weren’t steep.

 

“Do you happen to know anything about a Mr. Motier, who operates a textile factory?” she hesitantly asked the shopkeeper assisting her with the cape.

 

“Mr. Kedin Motier, you mean? He’s a kind gentleman. Sometimes, when passing by, he buys flowers from the basket girls. He once told me it was to gift to his wife.”

 

Kedin Motier—that was Theodore’s father.

 

The anecdote reflected the warm personality Lisbell had experienced in Theodore, and she pondered it for a moment. The shopkeeper, noticing her expression, smiled knowingly.

 

“Are you looking for Mr. Motier?”

 

“Ah, yes. I have business with his son.”

 

“Oh, I see! I don’t know his name, but I remember his face. He’s quite striking, just like his father.”

 

Lisbell nodded absentmindedly. Memories of that striking face buried in her lap, weeping, came to mind. Whatever expression she made must have amused the shopkeeper, who gave her a mischievous grin.

 

“I admire women who take the initiative. Times are changing, and people need to realize there’s nothing shameful about a woman seeking out a man first.”

 

Moved by her boldness, the shopkeeper even shared Theodore’s home address. Though not the precise location, it was enough: a red-roofed house beyond the canal bridge leading from the central plaza.

 

Lisbell left the shop, the bell above the door jingling softly, feeling optimistic.

 

The weather was perfectly clear, without a cloud in sight. Her train to Kings Morgan Station had been free of trouble, and she had discovered Theodore’s residence by chance.

 

Pulling her top lower, she set off in the direction the shopkeeper had indicated.

 

The afternoon in Renbruck was serenely peaceful.

 

Basket girls sold flowers; boys with berets zipped around on bicycles delivering parcels. Couples strolled arm-in-arm, enjoying leisurely dates. A young man sat on a bench sketching pigeons.

 

The tranquil, refreshing atmosphere felt surreal. As if it were a world she could never truly belong to.

 

Not long ago, she had been trapped in a more luxurious mansion in the capital, a preserved trophy, like a specimen.

 

The thought of it still made her nauseous, so much so that she shuddered violently.

 

When she remembered the cruel man smiling at her, it felt as if winter, which had been slowly fading away due to early spring, had returned. A strange chill crept up her spine, making her pull her cape tighter, buttoning it fully.

 

The day was still relatively short.

 

After walking for a while, the street quickly darkened. Gas lamps lit up, casting a soft glow.

 

It was then that Lisbell entered a densely packed residential area. Thanks to the gas lights, it wasn’t difficult to find the red roof.

 

Standing at the door, Lisbell felt the tension she had nearly forgotten grip her insides, squeezing her stomach. She couldn’t believe she was so nervous now. Placing her hand over her heart, she exhaled, slowly trying to calm herself.

 

‘I’m just here to explain what I couldn’t say before and leave.’

 

‘Why am I so anxious over something so trivial?’

 

‘I’m not thinking of doing anything with him now.’

 

‘I know better than to try anything foolish.’

 

‘Then why do I feel like I want something so badly?’

 

Lisbell clenched her hands tightly, shaking her head to dismiss the thoughts. After a deep breath, she raised her small hand and knocked on the round door knocker, ensuring the sound reached inside. A soft voice responded from within.

 

“Yes?”

 

The familiar voice made her heart race in response. She felt the approach of someone coming to the door. Lisbell stood firm, gathering all her resolve.

 

“…Lisbell?”

 

But all her preparation was useless.

 

As the door opened, and she saw Theodore standing there, his face filled with disbelief upon seeing her, all the thoughts and emotions that had crossed her mind evaporated.

 

The overwhelming sensation that surged up was an intense longing—so strong that it was almost laughable to deny. It was as if the image she had so long imagined had become real, and she couldn’t stop herself from sinking into that feeling.

 

This was different from the descent she had felt before.

 

It was the fall of a hopeful sign.

 

“Theodore.”

 

She tried to smile, to appear cheerful.

 

When she saw him again, she didn’t want to bring up the painful memories from before. She had intended to give him a wide, bright smile.

 

But seeing Theodore, gazing at her with trembling eyes, made it difficult. Her voice cracked with emotion, and despite her best efforts to hold back tears, her mouth twisted in a way that betrayed her struggle.

 

“Lisbell… is it really you?”

 

Theodore, visibly shocked, seemed to struggle to believe it. He quickly stepped out and closed the door behind him.

 

“How did you get here…?”

 

“It’s… well, Theodore, that is…”

 

Her words came out awkwardly, mixed with shallow breaths, making it hard to speak.

 

Finally, Lisbell couldn’t hold back the tears any longer.

 

He had once been her fiancé, someone she had thought she would only ever encounter in dreams or memories. The person she had longed for, and though everything had shattered, she still held onto the precious memories.

 

“I came to talk to you.”

 

She didn’t care anymore.

 

No, she wasn’t here just to clear up misunderstandings.

 

Lisbell wanted to start over from the very beginning.

 

She wanted to apologize to Theodore, ask for his forgiveness, and rebuild the future she had thrown away with her own hands. She wanted to rebuild the bright future they had once dreamed of together.

 

She wouldn’t hide anything anymore.

 

Once, she had thought it was for his sake, but in the end, it was fear of being hurt that made her hide everything. Now, she would confess everything.

 

With him, Theodore, she believed it would be okay. She felt she could do it, to break free from his grasp, from the suffocating air that had oppressed her.

 

She only hoped it wasn’t too late.

 

Holding onto Theodore’s arm, Lisbell looked at him, hoping that some of the feelings they had shared still remained within him, even a drop.

 

“Theodore? What’s going on?”

 

Just then, a door behind them opened. A woman stepped into view, looking for Theodore.

 

Lisbell froze, her gaze slowly falling downward.

 

The woman had a noticeable baby bump.


‘Huh…?’ 

 

Lisbell doubted her own eyes.  

 

Her gaze darted from the woman’s rounded belly to her face, then back down again, only to rise once more. The erratic movement of her eyes betrayed the confusion she felt.  

 

“Jane.”  

 

Theodore turned around, seemingly startled to see her out there. Gently, he placed a protective hand on Jane’s shoulder. Lisbell’s eyes latched onto that gesture, unable to look away.  

 

“It’s still cold outside. Why did you come out?”  

 

“You weren’t coming back, so I got worried. But… who is this?”  

 

“Oh, this is…”  

 

Theodore glanced toward Lisbell. A moment ago, his gaze had been filled with warmth, but now it pricked like thorns. She could read the discomfort on his face as clearly as if it had been written there.  

 

In that moment, everything became painfully clear.  

 

The space beside Theodore was no longer empty. The relationship she had once hoped to restore had long since faded into the past. Theodore and Jane were deeply in love; anyone could see that. There was no place for her in their story now.  

 

No, there wasn’t.  

 

Her place by Theodore’s side no longer existed.  

 

“I-I’m sorry.”  

 

Lisbell staggered back a step, her face flushing with heat. She wasn’t sure what she was feeling.  

 

Shame? Embarrassment? Or perhaps… disappointment?  

 

The tangled mess of emotions left her dizzy, unable to sort through them. She only knew that she wanted to flee—right now, right away. To hide, to disappear into the smallest hole she could find.  

 

She wanted to vanish from this world.  

 

“Maybe I should… I mean, I’ll just…”  

 

What words could possibly fit this moment?  

 

None seemed right.  

 

Her very presence here felt like a mistake. She shouldn’t have come. Her decision to show up was nothing but selfishness. The raw, exposed truth of her motives made her want to shrink into herself.  

 

As she struggled to decide what to do, her eyes met Jane’s. That was enough to make her turn and run.  

 

She had felt it earlier—an ominous sense that today wasn’t going to end well.  

 

That feeling had solidified the moment she noticed Jane.  

 

Unfortunately, her hurried steps landed her in a puddle. She slipped and fell awkwardly, her knees hitting the ground hard. Pain shot up her legs as muddy water splashed everywhere, staining her clothes.  

 

A mess.  

 

Everything was a mess—her mood, her appearance.  

 

What made her feel most pathetic was knowing Theodore was still standing behind her, witnessing it all. His very presence turned her into the most pitiful figure in the world.  

 

“Lisbell!”  

 

She didn’t even want his kindness at that moment. She might have preferred him to ignore her entirely—it would’ve hurt less.  

 

But Theodore wasn’t like that. He never had been.  

 

He rushed to her side, kneeling in the mud without hesitation. The sight of his knee soaking in the muck made tears well up in her eyes.  

 

“Jane, could you go inside and bring a towel? Please.”  

 

“Alright.”  

 

She heard Jane’s footsteps retreating into the house. Lisbell pressed her trembling hands against the ground, biting her lip hard. Theodore’s hand gently rested on her shoulder.  

 

Her lips moved as though someone had nudged her.  

 

“I’m sorry. I’m so sorry. I shouldn’t have come. I’ll leave now. Right now.”  

 

“What? What are you saying? You can’t leave like this! Your clothes are soaked, and your knee looks hurt.”  

 

  

 

“Come inside for a moment. Wash up, change into dry clothes, and rest a bit before you go. You don’t look well at all. Lisbell, please, okay?”  

 

With his help, she slowly stood up.  

 

His touch was warm, just as it always had been. Even though they were no longer lovers, that warmth hadn’t faded. It weighed heavily on her heart, a bittersweet reminder of everything they’d shared.  

 

Theodore was a man who offered kindness to anyone, regardless of their relationship with him. Memories of how his gentleness had comforted her flooded her mind, making her chest ache.  

 

A dizzying sensation swelled within her. Lisbell knew this feeling all too well.  

 

It was the same despair she’d felt lying naked on Ulrich’s bed, staring up at a bright, blue sky that seemed so unattainably distant.  

 

The kind of shame that made her wish she could hang herself from that unreachable sky.  

 



 

“Drink this. It’ll help warm you up.”  

 

A gentle warmth spread through her hands. The soothing aroma of herbal tea wafted softly in the air.  

 

Lowering her gaze, Lisbell took a sip. The warmth spread through her mouth, and, as Theodore had said, her body temperature seemed to rise slightly. But the chill within her remained, as though an irreparable gap had been etched into her core—something no material comfort could fill.  

 

“Ah, as I thought. You’ve got a bruise.”  

 

It wasn’t until he spoke that Lisbell realized Theodore was kneeling in front of her, examining her injured knee. She opened her mouth, wanting to say she was fine or that he didn’t need to do this, but no sound came out. Her lips parted uselessly before sealing shut again, and her downcast expression hardened into a thin line.  

 

Meanwhile, Theodore had already finished applying ointment with his usual gentle touch.  

 

“If you need more towels, I’ll get some,” he offered.  

 

“No, it’s fine,” she replied softly.  

 

A brief silence followed. It felt as if tiny insects were crawling beneath her skin. Realizing the distance that now separated her from someone she had once been so close to filled her with a bone-deep unease.  

 

‘What happens now?’  

 

Would he leave the room, telling her to rest for a while? Or would he try to strike up a friendly conversation, as he used to? What was Theodore thinking? Was he, too, feeling the weight of this distance, recalling their once-precious moments as nothing more than a fleeting dream?  

 

“Do you have somewhere to stay tonight?”  

 

When he finally spoke, Lisbell felt like a foolish dreamer lost in pointless fantasies. Here he was, so grounded in reality, while she remained trapped in naive, wishful thinking. Bitterness filled her mouth.  

 

“How about staying here for the night? There’s a forecast for rain in the early morning. If you push yourself to leave in your current state, you might catch a bad cold. Lisbell, you’ve always been prone to getting sick when the seasons change.”  

 

“But staying here… it doesn’t feel right.”  

 

“Jane will understand.”  

 

Ah. There it was again—her name, spoken so casually from Theodore’s lips. His tone was neutral, unremarkable even, yet it sounded unbearably tender to Lisbell, as if he’d spoken it after holding honey on his tongue. The bitterness inside her turned coarse and raw, like swallowing a lump of sand.  

 

“So, it’s just the two of you living here?” she asked.  

 

“Yes. My parents used to stay here too, but when I brought Jane to live with me, they moved to company housing near the industrial district. I guess they thought it would be more comfortable for us this way.”  

 

“I see.”  

 

Though she responded dutifully, Theodore’s words barely registered. They flowed through one ear and out the other. As her mind drifted, Lisbell bit down hard on her tongue to regain focus.  

 

A soft laugh broke the silence. She looked up just as the bed dipped slightly under his weight. Theodore had sat down beside her.  

 

“Our conversation feels so detached, doesn’t it?”  

 

“What?”  

 

“To be honest, I was surprised. No, I’m still surprised. I never thought you’d come looking for me like this.”  

 

There was weight to his words—or perhaps it was Lisbell’s memories of him that twisted them into something heavier.  

 

Her hands curled into fists on her lap.  

 

“I’m sorry…”  

 

The wretched final moments of their relationship weren’t only vivid in Theodore’s mind—they haunted Lisbell too. It was that clarity, that painfully sharp memory, that had driven her to seek him out, determined to explain herself.  

 

That had been her purpose.  

 

But when she set out to see him, she hadn’t imagined this. She hadn’t foreseen another woman by his side—a woman who was pregnant, who already seemed to have built a life with him.  

 

At this moment, all Lisbell could offer was an apology. Anything more would only come across as a selfish attempt to plead her case.  

 

“I didn’t bring it up to hear an apology,” Theodore said. “I just… I never thought I’d see you again.”  

 

“I didn’t think I’d see you again either!”  

 

This time, the words burst out of her, unstoppable.  

 

“It might not mean much to you now, in any way, but I wanted to see you, Theodore. Just once more. That’s why I came.”  

 

He might think she was lying.  

 

He might grow angry, lash out.  

 

But it was the truth.  

 

This was her unfiltered, undiluted sincerity.  


But that was purely her perspective and will.

 

That was why she became afraid to see Theodore’s reaction.  

 

When she lacked the courage to face him directly, stubbornly staring ahead instead, she felt a soft, deflating laugh graze her ear once more.  

 

“After what happened between us…”  

 

Lisbell immediately realized what he was referring to. That day at Marnia’s villa, the day she had broken off their engagement.  

 

“It wasn’t long after I returned to Misley. When our engagement was called off, I was preparing to leave and return to Renbruck. My parents wanted that too. But just before leaving Misley, I went to the square for something I needed and met Jane for the first time. She was a traveler. She approached me to ask for directions.”  

 

  

 

“That was all there was to our first meeting. It was such a brief moment that we didn’t even have time to introduce ourselves. I thought that would be the end of it. But a few days later, I ran into her again at a tavern near the station. We recognized each other, naturally ended up sitting together, and started chatting. Surprisingly, our conversation flowed easily. We had similar tastes, and the more we talked, the more I lost track of time.”  

 

  

 

“At the time, I was living in a haze of sadness—something uncharacteristic of me. I had been sincere about our engagement. When that dream shattered, all I felt was loss and confusion. I wasn’t sure if going back to Renbruck was the right decision or if it was what I truly wanted. I was wandering aimlessly, you could say.”  

 

It didn’t take much to realize what he was saying. He mentioned going to a tavern. Theodore didn’t drink. For someone like him to set foot in a tavern was proof of how much he had been struggling.  

 

“Jane was the one who pulled me out of it.”  

 

  

 

“Jane was a traveler, moving from place to place, and her stories of her adventures were fascinating. At that time, her stories were the only comfort I had. I started visiting the tavern daily, not for the drinks—I barely touched alcohol—but just to see her.”  

 

Perhaps she and Theodore had endured the same period of time with similar emotions—wandering, lost in chaos.  

 

But for him, the solution hadn’t been her.  

 

“Then, a few days later, Jane told me about a city she had always wanted to visit. It was a modern city with advanced industrial technology, bustling with diverse and free-spirited people coming and going.”  

 

  

 

“Yes, Renbruck.”  

 

  

 

“When I heard her mention Renbruck, I couldn’t help but wonder if this was fate. I hadn’t told Jane that it was my hometown, not even once. So it felt even more remarkable.”  

 

Theodore smiled softly.  

 

It was a smile he wore while thinking of her—Jane.  

 

The woman who had resolved the anguish Lisbell had caused him.  

 

The woman he now believed was his destiny.  

 

“…I see.”  

 

Lisbell clenched her fists so tightly her knuckles trembled. Her nails bit into her palms, causing a sharp sting. She tried to keep her voice steady, but it was futile. Her vocal cords quivered pitifully. Biting down hard on her lips to keep them from trembling, she muttered under her breath.  

 

“I knew I shouldn’t have come…”  

 

“That’s not it, Lisbell.”  

 

  

 

“I told you this because I want you to feel at ease with me. I want you to know that I’m no longer clinging to our past.”  

 

Those words should have brought her relief. But instead, they brought a lingering sadness that wouldn’t leave her. It felt bittersweet. She was glad his wounds had healed, but there was a strange sorrow in knowing they no longer bound him to her. The conflicting emotions unsettled her spirit sharply.  

 

Part of her felt like sighing in resignation.  

 

He really hadn’t changed. Even now, when she had appeared without notice, he hadn’t questioned her reasons or her circumstances. Instead, he had shown understanding and even tried to comfort her. He had even spoken about something that must have been hard for him to share, all to reassure her.  

 

“…Then, I’ll stay just for today.”

 

‘And I’ll leave tomorrow.’ 

 

She didn’t bother saying it out loud.  

 

Theodore likely wished for it too, even if he hadn’t expressed it. After all, Jane was here. Lisbell hid her lingering bitterness behind a forced smile.  

 

She had a feeling that tonight would feel particularly long.  

 

  

 

As soon as she finished the meal Theodore brought her, she collapsed onto the bed and fell asleep. She hadn’t realized how exhausted she was from days of running, unable to get proper rest. The delayed fatigue hit her all at once.  

 

But her sleep wasn’t deep. Perhaps the anxiety coiled inside her heart wouldn’t let her rest fully. She tossed and turned before waking up in the middle of the night.  

 

When she opened her eyes again, a light drizzle was falling outside the window. She wanted to sleep until morning, but the sound of raindrops tapping against the glass kept her awake.  

 

Lisbell sat up and ran her fingers through her messy hair. Her fine strands were always sensitive to the weather, and the moisture in the air left her hair more tangled than usual.  

 

As she half-heartedly tried to smooth it out, she froze. She suddenly remembered someone who used to playfully bite at her tangled strands on such days, calling them “adorably stubborn”. 

 

Shaking lightly, Lisbell rose from the bed.  

 

That’s when she noticed the tray on the bedside table. It wasn’t the herbal tea Theodore had given her earlier to warm her up. He must have returned to her room after bringing her dinner. Lisbell sipped the tea, now completely cold.  

 

It was icy. So cold it chilled her to the bone. It felt as though the warmth she had managed to regain was sinking back to the floor. Lisbell quietly set the cup down.  

 

Perhaps it wasn’t just the coldness of the tea.  

 

It might be the disappointment, gnawing deeper into her heart and soul, that was the true culprit.  

 

Swallowing a sigh, Lisbell, now fully awake, opened the bedroom door carefully.  

 

The sound of the rain grew heavier as she stepped outside. The enveloping sound of water made her feel as if she were standing in the middle of the ocean.  

 

It was as if a tide was rising, slowly creeping from her toes to her calves, knees, and thighs, threatening to engulf her entirely.  

 

Lisbell stood before the window, letting the melancholy in her heart flow away with the gentle rhythm of the rain. She stood there, lost, like someone unsure of where to go.  

 

“Miss Osborne.”  

 

She flinched, startled, realizing someone had approached her in the dim light.  

 

Turning quickly, she saw Jane standing there—the same woman she had seen earlier. Lisbell froze, unsure how to respond, as Jane, cradling her rounded belly, walked forward with a serene smile.  

 

“You’re awake.”  

 

“Yes, I think I dozed off for a bit.”  

 

“Here.”  

 

Jane handed something to her.  

 

“These are the clothes you were wearing earlier. I had them laundered, but you were asleep, so I planned to give them to you tomorrow.”  

 

“Thank you.”  

 

Lisbell realized she was currently wearing Jane’s clothes, lent to her at Theodore’s suggestion. For some reason, this made her feel even more uncomfortable. She quickly took the clothes from Jane’s hands.  

 

“We haven’t even properly introduced ourselves yet, have we? I’m Jane Hince.”  

 

“Oh, Lisbell Osborne.”  

 

She shook Jane’s outstretched hand. It was just a handshake, yet she felt an inexplicable tightness in her chest. When she raised her head, her eyes met Jane’s, which were curved into a gentle smile.  

 

But there was something off about those eyes.  

 

They felt artificial, like a hollow shell devoid of any soul. Lisbell was sure she had felt this kind of unease before, though she couldn’t place when.  

 

“Lisbell… is it?”  

 

  

 

“Why are you here?”  

 

Shhh.  

 

The rain’s sound suddenly seemed to fade. The tension thickened.  

 

“…Pardon?”  

 

“I heard you were Theodore’s former fiancée. That you dragged things out only to rudely demand a breakup, claiming you no longer loved him.”  

 

  

 

“How could someone like that show up here so shamelessly? I’m genuinely curious.”  

 

Jane’s expression remained pristine, like an untouched snowy field. Her words, though sharp, carried no genuine malice. Yet, they struck a nerve.  

 

They called out the guilt Lisbell had been ignoring, forcing her to confront it.  

 

At the same time, they made her understand Jane’s perspective—the discomfort she must feel and the disdain she clearly harbored for Lisbell.  


It was something beyond doubt.  

 

She wasn’t just anyone, she was his former fiancée.  

 

The woman who had once been romantically involved with the biological father of the life growing inside Jane’s womb. The same woman who had unilaterally ended their relationship in a manner so inconsiderate it tarnished every memory they had built together.  

 

For Jane, there was no reason to look kindly upon Lisbell.  

 

Why had she only just realized this?  

 

If Jane were to drive her out of here right now, there wouldn’t be a single person who could fault her for it. Given their relationship and circumstances, Jane was the one who rightfully belonged at Theodore’s side. That legitimacy served as the foundation for Jane’s aversion to Lisbell.  

 

Even now, Jane gently stroked her stomach. It didn’t seem like a deliberate display but rather an unconscious act. Still, the sight gnawed relentlessly at Lisbell’s thoughts.  

 

It was already late. Far too late for a pregnant woman to be awake. In fact, it was too late for anyone to be awake.  

 

If Jane’s sleeplessness at this hour was solely because of Lisbell…  

 

“I-I’m sorry.”  

 

Lisbell took a hesitant step back, her face growing hot.  

 

The tangled threads of emotions that Theodore’s words had stirred within her gradually sank beneath the surface. What emerged instead was an acute awareness of her presence here, an overwhelming sense of shame for coming to a place where she clearly didn’t belong and imposing on everyone.  

 

It felt as though she had been handed an undeniable verdict: that her presence here was neither needed nor wanted. And it was Jane, Theodore’s partner, who had delivered that realization, making Lisbell’s pride crumble even further.  

 

“If my presence made you uncomfortable….”  

 

  

 

“No, if it upset you….”  

 

Her attempt at an apology was cut off by Jane’s calm, steady voice.  

 

“Why don’t you leave now?”  

 

Lisbell stared at her in a daze, forgetting even the heat rising to her cheeks.  

 

Jane’s expression hadn’t changed. There was no trace of hostility, nor was there any other discernible emotion. She appeared entirely devoid of feeling, as though she wasn’t capable of experiencing emotion in the first place.  

 

That wax-like stillness sent a chill through Lisbell. A peculiar sense of déjà vu that she couldn’t shake.  

 

It was as if she had seen this before, somewhere.  

 

For a brief moment, she racked her brain, but the answer eluded her. Lisbell couldn’t bear to look at Jane any longer and turned her head away.  

 

It was only then that Jane’s words fully registered.  

 

“You’d be better off returning to where you came from.”  

 

Perhaps Jane thought Lisbell hadn’t heard her, for she repeated herself with even more clarity.  

 

To where you came from.  

 

Even though Lisbell was certain Jane didn’t know the implications of her words, they still felt chilling. As if she were being cursed to return to the man who had turned her life into a ruin, desperate to grasp even the ashes that remained.  

 

Lisbell bit down hard on the inside of her cheek.  

 

Her despair in this moment was meaningless. Theodore had been kind enough to extend her some grace, and if Jane desired him, then leaving was the only right choice. In fact, she felt foolish for not reaching that conclusion sooner.  

 

Lisbell bowed deeply to Jane in apology. She returned to her room, changed, and packed her belongings. Her trembling hands dropped and fumbled with items several times, but she persisted until everything was in place. Then, she left Theodore’s residence.  

 

The door, which had been so difficult to approach and knock on, now opened far too easily as she exited.  

 

Pulling her hood tightly over her head, Lisbell retraced her steps back into the night. Without an umbrella, her body was quickly drenched by the rain, yet she found herself oddly numb to it.  

 

She walked along the dimly lit streets for about twenty minutes, passing a square before eventually reaching the distant silhouette of the train station.  

 

“Ha….”  

 

A breath escaped her lips, half a sigh, half a gasp, as she entered the station.  

 

Kings Morgan Station was nothing like it had been during the day. With no late-night trains running, the place was eerily empty. She had expected to see at least a few vagrants or drifters, but the station seemed to be meticulously maintained, with not a single soul in sight.  

 

For now, Lisbell found comfort in the silence.  

 

Having been driven out of a place where she had sought shelter, she felt like an unwelcome guest no matter where she went. In that sense, this desolate public space felt more tolerable.  

 

She decided to wait until dawn. When the first train began its morning run, she would leave.  

 

‘…But where?’  

 

Sitting on a bench, staring blankly ahead, Lisbell tilted her head back.  

 

The ceiling of the station, made of stone framework, came into view. Perhaps due to the rain, the sky was hidden. The clouds, the moon, the stars—nothing could be seen, and the surrounding darkness was overwhelming. It felt as if the darkness itself was peering into her mind.

 

‘Where am I supposed to go now?’

 

Her internal compass seemed lost, spinning in circles. The more she reflected on her own helpless situation, the more hopeless it became.

 

Occasionally, the breaths she exhaled turned into a bewildered laugh.

 

Why did it come to this?

 

The weak laughter that had started as a chuckle soon turned into sobs. Lisbell pulled her knees up onto the bench and hugged them close to her chest. She curled into herself, her body huddling so tightly that her forehead gently rested against her knees, gradually dampening with tears.

 

Yes, the truth is…

 

She had hoped, just a little.

 

She had hoped that there was still something she could turn back, that it wasn’t too late.

 

If she explained everything that had happened to her, kind Theodore would surely listen and eventually take her back into his arms.

 

She had to give up on her mother, but maybe, just maybe, her relationship with Theodore still had a chance.

 

Why had she never considered it for a single moment?

 

The assumption that Theodore might already have someone by his side.

 

Wasn’t it obvious? The hope she had been clinging to was blind. It wasn’t real hope but a base desire, nothing more.

 

“……!”

 

Suddenly, Lisbell’s shoulders jolted.

 

A pure, monotone sound echoed through the station, which seemed to be asleep. The silence was so intense that the sound struck her ears sharply.

 

She quickly located the source of the sound. It was a phone attached to the wall near the platform where the trains entered. It was for emergency use, where one could pay to call the station in case something urgent arose.

 

Right now, that phone was ringing.

 

The sound was loud enough to grab her attention, but it was only for a moment. Lisbell knew she had to decide where to go once morning came, before anything else. 

 

The world was vast, and there were places to go. However, they were mostly empty, lacking anyone who might remember her. Moving forward into a land where no one knew her seemed an impossible task. This was why she had tried to escape, defying her husband’s wish to go to Dukas. It had been the same reason.

 

While lost in thought, the ringing phone gradually faded into silence. In the sudden stillness that returned, Lisbell closed her eyes.

 

‘Are they still… looking for me?’

 

Moreover, this was not something that would be resolved simply by moving.  

 

Lisbell needed to be careful so she would never fall back into that man’s grasp. She might even have to abandon her former identity and completely transform herself into someone else, a risk she had never considered until now. The thought gave her a headache.

 

‘Why… why do I have to bear all of this?

 

Why can’t I be where I want to be…’

 

The unjustness rose up again, pressing heavily against her chest.

 

“Then, if you ever choose to become independent and start a new family, I want to remain a place where you can always come back to. Like a hometown, like a starting point.”

 

Her mother’s words suddenly came to mind, making her feel especially sorrowful today. When she thought about it, those words had almost seemed like a heartfelt will. Lisbell lowered her legs from her chest, grabbed the bag at her feet, and stood up.

 

At that moment, the phone in the distance rang once more. This time, she wasn’t as startled as before.  

 

Lisbell quickly opened the bag and reached to the bottom where her mother’s clothes were. It was a comforting gesture, one she had made many times before, but today it didn’t bring the comfort she had hoped for.

 

“This wrapping garment… didn’t it feel too tight for you, Mother?”

 

“I actually prefer it this way.”

 

Her mother always wore clothes that were so tight around her neck, shoulders, and limbs that it was almost suffocating. The clothes Lisbell was now handling weren’t much different from those. Her mother had once explained that it was due to her long years spent in a monastery, and this style of dress was more comfortable for her.

 

‘…A monastery?’

 

Lisbell’s hand suddenly stopped.


“Allante? Mother, what is Allante?”  

 

“It’s the name of a monastery where I once owed a debt before having you. In the world, it’s called St. Allante Monastery.”  

 

It was the name inscribed in elegant handwriting on the first page of her mother’s Bible—a Bible her mother had never abandoned, no matter how often they moved due to their difficult circumstances.  

 

St. Allante Monastery. Her mother had come from there.  

 

“A monastery…”  

 

Lisbell pulled her mother’s clothing into her lap.  

 

Whenever they spoke about it, her mother never seemed to regret being cast out from that place. She had accepted the consequences of her actions with quiet grace, likely shaped by the life she had led there.  

 

The church of Portly near Saint Laurent came to mind.  

 

It had snowed for the first time that year when Lisbell buried her mother there. The memory of leaving things unresolved still filled her with shame and frustration. Yet, at the time, there was nothing she could do but retreat quietly.  

 

Perhaps it was the monastery, not that lonely grave, where her mother should have been laid to rest.  

 

Wouldn’t that be the truest show of devotion a daughter could offer?  

 

It wasn’t too late. Her mother’s body may have been taken by that vile family, but she still had her mother’s clothes, almost like relics.  

 

If she could send her mother off properly, even in this small way, it would be enough.  

 

A clarity swept through her mind like a cleansing gust of wind. The scattered, chaotic thoughts that had clouded her judgment began to settle.  

 

She had a destination now.  

 

St. Allante Monastery.  

 

The rest could wait until she properly honored her mother’s memory.  

 

With her decision made, Lisbell neatly folded the clothes, packed them away, and closed her bag.  

 

She recalled her mother mentioning where the monastery was when she was younger. To get there, she’d need to cross the vast ocean. Even after changing trains several times, she’d eventually have to pass through a port.  

 

Renbruck, known as a leading industrial city due to its rapid industrialization, certainly had a port.  

 

She remembered something Theodore had mentioned once—about a port near a farm his father’s factory had a contract with. Occasionally, when his father took him to the farm, they would attend the auctions held at the port.  

 

Even if it wasn’t Renbruck, many cities in Rechem had ports. The seafaring routes that connected to other nations were vital for economic growth, enabling industrial development and strengthening local commerce. Rechem, which had grown into a prosperous nation, made full use of these functions.  

 

It didn’t matter which port she used—she just needed to leave.  

 

Lisbell stood from the bench, gripping her bag. She needed to find the quickest route. She turned toward the train station to check the schedules. Since she had to stay up all night anyway, she might as well make use of the time.  

 

But as her shoes hit the ground, a sound pierced her ears—the persistent ringing of a phone she had been ignoring.  

 

  

 

A strange unease settled over her.  

 

Lisbell froze, as if someone had grabbed her. Slowly, she turned her head toward the ringing phone.  

 

Now that she thought about it…  

 

“That phone… it’s not for receiving calls, is it?”  

 

Why had she only realized this now?  

 

The phone was clearly meant for outgoing calls, not incoming ones. Who would even try to call this phone, expecting someone to answer?  

 

Her suspicion turned into a chilling sensation in her gut, spreading like frost through her body.  

 

The ringing wouldn’t stop. It rang, paused, and rang again—a third time now. The sound seemed to beckon her, an unseen hand urging her to approach. The echoes of the ringing spread like toxic fog, filling the floor, shaking the air, and encircling the ceiling.  

 

What had seemed like a familiar noise moments ago now felt unbearably sharp, like a shattering sound in her ears.  

 

The world around her grew deafeningly chaotic.  

 

Now that she thought about it, the emptiness of the station was also peculiar. No matter how strictly law and order were maintained, could it really be possible for no one to be here? Especially on such a stormy night…  

 

It seemed more plausible that someone had deliberately driven everyone out to create this artificial stillness.  

 

If that were true… running away wasn’t the solution.  

 

The situation felt like a trap, leaving her with no choice but to answer the phone. Lisbell slowly moved toward the device. The ringing pierced her brain like a sharp needle. Nothing about the sound had actually changed. The decibel level remained constant, but her heartbeat grew slower and heavier. The tension twisted her chest, rising with each step.  

 

Before she knew it, she was standing in front of the phone. The saliva in her throat wouldn’t go down. As she picked up the receiver, the dizzying noise abruptly stopped. The receiver felt impossibly heavy, as though time itself dragged on as she raised it to her ear.  

 

— …….  

 

  

 

The line was connected, yet silence hung in the air. Neither Lisbell nor the person on the other end spoke. A razor-sharp silence lingered, slipping like a blade across a shared breath.  

 

Even without words, the presence on the other end was undeniable, vivid in her mind.  

 

— Hah….  

 

A low sigh scratched at her taut eardrums.  

 

The first sound.  

 

A blend of a lament and a sigh of relief, it marked the moment when time, which had seemed to stand still, began to flow again.  

 

Lisbell’s hand trembled as she gripped the receiver. As if he could see her trembling, a quiet chuckle echoed from the other side. It felt calculated, as though he’d timed the mockery he hid like a knife beneath his tongue.  

 

There was only one person who could be this cruel and venomous toward her.  

 

With just a sigh and a faint laugh, she could already identify him. She loathed her ability to recognize him so easily.  

 

— Lisbell.  

 

  

 

— I know you’re there.  

 

  

 

— How do you feel, playing this game of hide-and-seek with me?  

 

  

 

— Have you decided to keep quiet?  

 

His voice, dry and low as it filtered through the receiver, was even more provoking than if she’d heard it directly.  

 

Lisbell closed her eyes tightly, then opened them again.  

 

When she still didn’t respond, the man began speaking again, as if coaxing her with false gentleness.  

 

— Don’t do this. Do you know how much I’ve been waiting for this moment?  

 

  

 

— I can’t even remember the last time I heard your voice. If you’d just say my name with that cat-like voice of yours, I might lose myself entirely.  

 

  

 

— Stubborn as ever.  

 

He clicked his tongue, his tone playful. Lisbell bit the inside of her cheek hard enough to draw pain.  

 

To him, this was still a game.  

 

To her, each moment was a life-or-death struggle, a series of unbearable decisions. But to him, it was nothing more than a whim, a trivial indulgence. And that realization was pushing her pride into the suffocating depths of helplessness.  

 

— Fine, then. Just keep listening quietly.  

 

  

 

— I’m not fond of this situation, Lisbell. You see, I’m not accustomed to watching someone’s back as they leave.  

 

What did he mean by that?  

 

His words often left marks on her mind, searing like brands. Lisbell tried to brush them off, to let them pass. She even considered hanging up the phone. But she couldn’t. She felt as though invisible chains were tightening around her, her body growing rigid.  

 

This phone call was dragging out the memories she’d tried so hard to bury, forcing her to confront them one by one.  

 

— Still, since you’ve gone through the trouble of running, why don’t you try hiding well?  

 

  

 

— Not a single strand of hair in sight. Hide completely….  

 

Every word he spoke dripped with deliberate leisure, his tone overflowing with confidence. To her shock, he hung up first, ending the call with an air of dismissive ease.  

 

Lisbell lowered the receiver slowly as the disconnected tone buzzed faintly in her ear. Her hand finally dropped when lightning silently flashed through the station windows, illuminating everything in stark brightness. The burst of light seared her mind like blue bruises etched into her memory.  

 

The man knew where she was.  

 

She only had one thought in mind.

 

She had to escape.

 

Lisbell slammed the receiver down as if throwing it. Then she quickly turned her body. Grabbing the bag she had set aside, she tried to run toward the entrance of the station she had just passed through.

 

But before she could, another thunderclap struck.

 

This time, it came with sound.

 

Boom—

 

The noise sounded as if the world itself was collapsing, and it grabbed hold of Lisbell’s ankle.

 



 

What if… he was already here?

 

What if he was already set up outside, waiting for her? If that was the case, leaving now would be like willingly sticking her head into a beast’s den.

 

Her hurried steps faltered, and she stopped.

 

The cold sound of rain pierced through her body. Lisbell slowly released the inner cheek she had been biting, the tingling pain on her mucous membranes helping her regain some clarity.

 

She had to focus.

 

If the strange scene inside the station was something he had orchestrated, then it’s possible that his influence had already reached this station. That meant it was highly likely he was waiting outside, preparing for her to come out.

 

But if that were the case, why hadn’t he made a move?

 

If he had already made it this far, he could have simply forced his way in. There was no need to create a situation like this, with her on edge.

 

So maybe…

 

‘Perhaps he’s trying to exploit my fear.’

 

Lisbell absentmindedly touched her neck, then turned her head to look at the phone. If the line was open, she could still make a call from another location.

 

In other words, Ulrich might not have even arrived here yet.

 

And based on everything she had experienced so far, he often set up scenarios where she was thrown into a situation to see how she would react. If this were another such case… leaving the station right now would lead to reckless consequences.

 

Shivering, her hands feeling unnaturally cold, Lisbell took a few steps back. She had to leave through a different exit, not the main one.

 

She looked around.

 

To the left, there were stairs leading to the platform where the trains arrived. To the right…

 

‘…A coach depot.’

 

Given the industrial nature of the new city, a large amount of goods was transported into the city every day, not only through the distant harbor but also via the train station. Therefore, the station needed coaches to transport goods, and they were kept in the depot.

 

Lisbell quickly headed toward it.

 

Since this station didn’t operate late-night trains, the depot was dark and silent.

 

She could see the iron doors tightly shut in front of the coaches, preventing any light from coming through. Likely, someone would open the huge doors when it was time to start the trains, and then the goods would be delivered to their respective locations.

 

If she hid here, it might be possible to escape the station without needing to pass through the main exit.

 

Lisbell crouched low and moved between the coaches. Some were empty, while others were already loaded with goods. The latter had probably been delivered last night, but because it was too late, they were planning to deliver them early the next morning. If she wanted to escape quickly, she needed to pick a coach that was already loaded.

 

Luckily, the coaches with goods had tags clearly indicating the items and their delivery destinations. After inspecting them, she found a large wooden box covered with a black tarp—perfect for hiding.

 

Lisbell grunted as she climbed onto the back of the coach. She carefully shifted the box to one side, creating just enough space for her to hide inside. Curling up, she pulled her bag into her arms.

 

For now, she had to wait until dawn.

 

During that time, she might hear sounds from outside. Someone might be certain she was inside and come looking for her, Ulrich’s subordinates, or perhaps him in person.

 

Lisbell exhaled a shallow breath, suppressing the urge to make noise.

 

Despite the situation, an odd sleepiness began to creep over her. Perhaps it was a physiological defense mechanism, her body cooling down due to stress, triggering an overwhelming urge to sleep. They say that when trapped in a cold place, one often falls into a deep sleep.

 

Hoping that the quiet rain would mask her presence, Lisbell fell into a restless sleep, waking in between.

 

“…Damn. It’s been raining like crazy since dawn…”

 

“What’s with this rain since the morning…”

 

“Anyway, let’s head out right away. The weather’s been bad, so we’re already delayed more than expected.”

 

“Let’s do that. Be cautious, the roads are slippery.”

 

Clunk!

 

The cart suddenly shook violently.

 

Along with the vibration, the boxes that had been hiding her small body all shook at once, waking Lisbell up. The storage area, which had been pitch black, was now brightly lit, as if nothing had happened. She didn’t dare poke her head out, but it was clear that the iron door, which had been tightly shut, was now open.

 

As she had guessed, the cart she was hiding in began to move little by little. The smell of rain pouring in from the separate exit, not the one for regular traffic, grew stronger.

 

The mist created by the rain during the night had spread thickly around them.

 

After a short while, the cart, having left the station, disappeared into the fog.

 

How long had they been going?

 

The cart had been shaking for quite some time. Lisbell, who had been holding her breath, realized they had traveled a long distance and released the tension in her neck.

 

Rubbing the stiff part of her neck, she lifted the black tarp around her and peered out. Not seeing Kings Morgan station or the plaza around it, it seemed they had passed the busy main road.

 

Good, at least… she had gotten out of the station.

 

The world, stained with relief, was slightly slanted. It seemed they were climbing a hill.

 

She cleverly moved the boxes that had been hiding her body. Then, gripping the high railing to keep the goods from falling due to the cart’s vibrations, she stuck her head out.

 

Since the cart was climbing a hill, it wasn’t moving too fast. The moment when she had jumped off the train with Mrs. Altahart’s secretary came to mind. Lisbell squeezed her eyes shut and prepared to jump off the moving cart.

 

“Ugh…!”

 

She rolled to the side, but fortunately, only some dust stuck to her, and she wasn’t seriously injured. After a moment of catching her breath while lying on the ground, she stood up, clutching her bag tightly.

 

‘The harbor… Is it only the harbor?’

 

The train station would likely be under even stricter surveillance from now on. No matter how hard she tried, there were limits to escaping in such a confined place. She had to head to the harbor, which was much larger, more crowded, and difficult to track, with many ships arriving every day.

 

‘The farm is on the outskirts. And there should be a harbor nearby.’

 

It was still raining, and her vision was limited, but that was not an issue exclusive to her misfortune. The people chasing her, under Ulrich’s orders, were also experiencing reduced visibility, so she needed to keep moving steadily despite her current discomfort.

 

Lisbell slightly lifted the front part of the cloche she was wearing. The tilted brim blocked the rainwater flowing down her face, allowing her to see a bit ahead. She wiped away the rainwater that hadn’t yet fallen off her cheek.

 

Given the weather, it would be great to catch a ride, but… she couldn’t risk being caught, so for now…

 

As she looked around, something brightly colored caught her attention. A red roof, standing out even from a distance.

 

It was the very place she had set out from this morning—Theodore’s house.

 

Just seeing it made her heart ache. The more she remembered the conversations that had taken place there, the more it hurt.

 

She probably wouldn’t come back again.

 

There was no reason to return, no excuse to.

 

So this would likely be the last time she’d see it…

 

She regretted not leaving a short note.

 

Theodoree, who had no idea of what had happened early in the morning, would surely be shocked when he realized she was gone. With his delicate and kind nature, his mind would be filled with worries.

 

Lisbell bit her lip tightly, turning away. She barely managed to swallow the sob that threatened to rise in her throat.

 

Then, a small, bitter laugh escaped.

 

When had her feelings for him become so full of regret?

 

Gradually, the laugh subsided, and Lisbell took slow steps toward the direction of the farm.

 

She resisted the urge to turn around repeatedly.

 

Revisiting the wounds she had given him, recalling the words of the person who had been by his side, reflecting on them, and engraving them deep in her bones… This was the farewell that had required such relentless effort.


Lisbell arrived at the outskirts earlier than expected.

 

There had been a crisis along the way. Without an umbrella, she had ended up completely soaked like a drowned rat, and her body, which hadn’t gotten any proper rest during the night, couldn’t fight off the fatigue that clung to her in waves.

 

Though she had definitely left behind the city with its government buildings and shops, entering the barren wilderness left her feeling confused, not knowing which way to go. It felt as though she had lost her way.

 

She barely managed to find shelter under a large, rounded rock, beneath the wide, light green willow branches, when she spotted a cart slowly approaching in the distance.

 

Thinking it might be someone looking for her, she hid, but it turned out to be a regular hay cart. Once she realized that, she had an odd feeling. This cart might be heading toward the farm she was after.

 

So, taking advantage of the driver’s distracted moment, she stealthily climbed onto the back. How many times had she done this, sneaking a ride? Lisbell smiled wryly as she hid behind the haystacks piled high.

 

As expected, the cart smoothly headed toward the outskirts. During the journey, the rain that had fallen all morning stopped. When she saw the large fields stretching out before a farm, Lisbell quietly got off the cart.

 

The harbor was much closer to the farm than she had expected. Standing on the hill where she could see the farm, she could even spot the harbor in the distance—so close that it could almost be considered next door.

 

Even from here, the bustling atmosphere of the harbor surged toward her, waking her senses. The long pier, the ships docked there, the many merchants, and the rows of shops were visible.

 

The scale of the harbor was larger than she had anticipated.

 

In a corner, people had gathered in a noisy auction, shouting at the top of their lungs, while several sailors moved briskly between the large ships and the harbor in preparation for the imminent departure.

 

Above, the clear sky had opened up, and seagulls, with wings spread wide, flew freely. Cats with tricolor fur, drawn by the scent of fish, darted around nimbly.

 

The lively atmosphere, as bustling as a market, was certainly a perfect place for someone to hide.

 

Lisbell lowered the brim of her cloche, which she had previously lifted, and approached the harbor.

 

She was hoping to do something about her wet clothes and was fortunate to find a clothing shop among the row of stores. Although she wanted to change into a blouse and skirt, her purse was tight, so she decided to save as much as possible and only exchanged her cape for a new one.

 

Standing in front of a mirror, she lifted the cloche, but despite the hat, her hair, already a tangled mess, could not be salvaged. She tried to comb through it with her hands, but the more she touched it, the worse it got. Eventually, it became so tangled that she couldn’t even brush it properly. Lisbell sighed as she looked down at the mass of hair in her hands.

 

“Lisbell’s hair is just like the cotton blossoms I held back then.”

 

“Should I call it a cute feeling…?”

 

She couldn’t help but recall the actions of the man who had always touched, combed, and even bitten her hair, as if he really liked it.

 

When Theodore said those things, they had come across as warm as sunlight, but when Ulrich spoke them, they felt utterly ridiculous, turning into an offensive insult that left her feeling deeply displeased. Her face scrunched up, as though she had swallowed muddy water, and Lisbell hurriedly untangled her hair.

 

She quickly finished fixing her hair before anyone could notice and pulled her hat back on. Unlike before, this time she rolled her long hair into a neat coil inside the hat, tucking in the stray strands.

 

After a brief greeting, she stepped outside.

 

The afternoon light, gentle and slow like a breeze, streamed down from the clear sky after the rain. It was hard to imagine the violent storm and thunderclaps of the early morning.

 

The harbor was full of curious onlookers. Even those not intending to take a boat seemed to have come to see the lively atmosphere firsthand. Blending in among the crowd, Lisbell managed to buy a ticket for the boat heading toward the country with the monastery.

 

There were still two hours until departure.

 

To kill time, Lisbell went in search of a crowded tavern to grab a meal. The inside of the tavern was dim, relying only on a few lamps to light the space.

 

A few sailors in dark blue uniforms were gathered in one corner, playing darts, while some other customers were sitting opposite each other, puffing smoke from their cigarettes and playing poker, laughing.

 

Lisbell, sticking to the wall to avoid them, sat down at a table closer to the bar and ordered a simple meal and drink.

 

Lisbell had been worried about getting asked questions, but it seemed the staff had encountered travelers like her before and didn’t show much interest. From the way customers were ordering more food, it seemed there wasn’t much time to spare for single diners. This allowed Lisbell to breathe a sigh of relief.

 

Although she had no appetite, she forced herself to eat the ordered food. Occasionally, when the food got stuck in her throat, she washed it down with water.

 

Then, suddenly, she sensed movement at a table behind her, which startled her. Reining in her stomach, which had nearly turned over, Lisbell gripped the handle of her bag tightly. She was ready to leave the shop at a moment’s notice.

 

But luckily, it seemed they were customers of the harbor, as they loudly called the staff over to place their orders. Lisbell, who had been paying attention, subtly diverted her focus and continued eating her remaining food.

 

“Damn it. The sole of my shoe’s all soggy. I must’ve stepped into a puddle up ahead.”

 

“Should’ve been more careful.”

 

“Did I know this would happen? What am I supposed to do when the car can’t come this far in? Damn it, why is there such sudden street control? And with all that military force being mobilized.”

 

Lisbell’s brief sense of calm didn’t last. The fork she had been holding fell from her mouth. Her attention quietly shifted back to the table behind her.

 

“Seems like there’s some dispute among the high-ups, huh?”

 

“No, no. I heard they’re looking for a woman.”

 

“A woman?”

 

“Yes. I saw some soldiers grabbing the shoulders of every woman who passed by, checking their faces.”

 

The food that had gone down her throat seemed to twist in her stomach. Lisbell, trying to suppress her nausea, gulped down some cold water.

 

“What? Is that true? Ha, wow. If it is, they’re really wasting manpower! Which woman managed to sneak off with some bigwig’s back and run away?”

 

Lisbell wanted to observe the situation with the same detached amusement as them, but there was something unsettling that made it impossible for her to laugh. Instead of amusement, cold sweat began to trickle down her back.

 

Control. Soldiers. Women. Faces….

 

Lisbell calmly packed her bag and stood up.

 

“From the way they’re searching every shop like rats, maybe it’s true.”

 

“Do you think this shop might get a surprise inspection too?”

 

“Could be. I heard soldiers were right by the side of the shop.”

 

Her steps, which had been heading directly for the exit, stopped because of those words. Lisbell quietly watched the sailors at the entrance tossing colorful darts.

 

A moment later, through the open door, she saw a shadow moving, like the edge of a swamp, swaying. A sharp instinct hit the top of her head. The air felt ominous. She immediately turned her body and moved back toward the inner part of the shop, away from the entrance.

 

When she was about to open the warehouse door she had seen the staff go in and out of earlier, a commotion erupted behind her. While the shop had been noisy throughout, this felt different.

 

In fact, if you measured by sound, the shop had become eerily quiet.

 

She could sense all attention in the room focused in one direction, and it reached her even at the back of her head. As she turned to close the warehouse door, she caught a glimpse of the shopkeeper, who had been standing inside near the long bar, rushing toward the door while shouting, “What’s going on?!”

 

Click…

 

She quietly shut the door and turned the lock.

 

Her heart was pounding fiercely.

 

The frantic beats of her heart, no longer hidden by the rain, surged within her chest, tightening their grip. Lisbell leaned her forehead against the door, her expression pained. Her stomach had become so cold that she felt like the food she had just eaten might crawl back up her throat.

 

Please, please.

 

She silently prayed to the unseen force behind the door.

 

You have been indifferent to me until now. So please, just this once… Please, let me not be discovered. Hide me.

 

Her desperate plea went unanswered.

 

The sound of heavy footsteps entering the shop filled the air, like the approach of an inevitable despair.


The salty smell wafting from afar was revolting.

 

Was it the scent of the sea, the harbor, or perhaps… escape?

 

Ulrich’s lazily closed eyelids lifted. His pale grayish-blue irises, framed by elegant lashes, reflected the vast expanse of the sea stretched before him.

 

Perched on a wooden cargo crate, he stared at the distant horizon, looking like a man on the verge of dozing off. Everyone wandering around the controlled inner harbor stole a glance at him at least once.

 

It was inevitable. His appearance had a captivating pull that was hard to resist. His bespoke shirt and pants were tailored perfectly to his frame, but the lack of a tie and vest, with a few buttons casually undone, exuded a freedom that enhanced his mystique amid the balance of order and chaos.

 

Even his posture, gazing pensively at the horizon as though lost in deep thought, contributed to the allure. The crimson hues of the setting sun danced around him, enhancing his beauty. The undying brilliance of nature seemed to exist solely for him.

 

Faced with such radiance, Ulrich closed his eyes again.

 

Thump, thump, thump.

 

The pounding in his chest grew more intense.

 

This was a first—something entirely unfamiliar.

 

It wasn’t just this strange inner turmoil. His hands and toes tingled, as if swept by an electric current, and without realizing it, he kept clenching and unclenching his hands, while his toes fidgeted restlessly.

 

What was this?

 

He’d get her eventually.

 

She would inevitably fall into his hands, yet this inexplicable unease lingered, as if things wouldn’t go his way.

 

It was so close now.

 

The lead from Kings Morgan Station had long been acted upon, and the area was under control. Finding nothing there had expanded the search area to this harbor near the outskirts.

 

She would only have confided in Theodore Mortier, the one person she had deep ties with in this region. If she’d learned of his circumstances, she likely would have been unable to restrain herself and fled here.

 

Other than him, there was no other connection she could rely on in Renbruck. Thus, she would likely try to leave Renbruck, and to do so, she would have to pass through either the train station or the harbor.

 

If not caught at the station, she must be here.

 

And if not here, the next step would be to comb through all of Renbruck to find her. To prevent any interference, he had personally silenced his mother by acquiring the massive Pyrilleo Mines at an astronomical price.

 

Yet still, his nerves remained unsettled.

 



 

Ulrich reached into his pocket, retrieving a gold case. He opened it to pull out a cigarette, then clamped it between his lips. The sharp sound of the case snapping shut echoed unnaturally in the stillness around him.

 

He idly bit the cigarette, scanning the harbor bathed in the glow of the setting sun.

 

A slow smile spread across his lips.

 

Yes, the unexpected variable had been failing to catch her at the train station.

 

Lisbell Osborne had undoubtedly been present when the call connected. Ulrich had already pinpointed her location through his informant before arriving in Renbruck.

 

Kings Morgan Station didn’t operate at night, and he had planned to arrive before dawn. Naturally, she should’ve been in his grasp by now. But somehow, Lisbell had evaded the eyes stationed around the station and slipped away with unnerving composure.

 

“Like a frightened cat, sneaking so delicately…”

 

He tilted his head and chuckled softly, his tongue curling in amusement. He almost wanted to laugh out loud, clutching his stomach. The platinum-blond hair falling to one side glistened under the natural light.

 

“Young master.”

 

Victor, who had momentarily stepped away for urgent business, returned with a scowl. Ulrich immediately understood the source of his reaction.

 

“I’m not going to light it, so stop glaring at me like that.”

 



 

“I just needed something to bite on.”

 

It was an excuse, but Victor didn’t seem satisfied. He glanced around, checking the surroundings for reporters who might have followed them.

 

There was no need for such caution. Anyone intent on following would’ve already done so.

 

Amused by the unnecessary worry, Ulrich bit the tip of his cigarette.

 

The Ulrich family had a strict policy against smoking outdoors, fearing the risk of being photographed by reporters. Similarly, except for a light pre-meal drink, they refrained from consuming alcohol in public.

 

For a businessman, public image was everything. It played a significant role in securing large investments or being introduced to influential opportunities. In a society where every aspect of one’s behavior could ripple through the business world, appearances were managed with the utmost care.

 

And Ulrich had never once crossed that boundary before.

 

Yet now, unable to endure this brief waiting, he had taken out a cigarette. Victor glanced around the harbor with a heavy heart. Thanks to the well-placed bribes over time, Colonel Craxson had readily lent his troops within half a day of the request. The soldiers dressed in Rechem military uniforms wandering around the harbor, inspecting the faces of women, were the manpower mobilized for this operation.

 

“My stomach feels unsettled.”

 

“Excuse me? Your stomach? How so? Is it serious?”

 

Victor’s immediate reaction to the monotone remark was exaggerated.

 

“No…”

 

He felt uneasy. Uncomfortable.

 

Ulrich knew well that this wasn’t a physical ailment. That knowledge made him say no more, clenching the cigarette between his teeth. The bitter taste spreading across his tongue mirrored his inner turmoil.

 

Far off, the half-disc of the sun burned on the horizon. He had only looked away for a moment, but in that time, it had sunk a little further below.

 

Bit by bit. Slowly. Like an invasion. Like erosion.

 

Anxiety.

 

What was creeping into him, unsettling his core, was anxiety.

 

It had been so long since he last felt it that its presence was unfamiliar.

 

Anxiety. A sense of crisis. Restlessness. Fear.

 

When was the last time he’d endured the messy, clawing sensation of such emotions? Ironically, Ulrich’s life had been stripped of these feelings, and with them, the dynamic pleasures of existence had been lost at the root. On the other hand, now that the fierce throb of his heart was vividly resonating within him, he had no sense of how time was passing.

 

Every day since Lisbell had been taken from him had been like this.

 

Handling what needed to be handled, organizing what needed to be organized- somehow, today had arrived. He couldn’t even fathom how he had managed to gather information on Daphne Schwaben, annul the engagement with her, and leave a thread of leverage over his mother.

 

His memory of how he had come this far was blurred.

 

In the process, there had been no room to feel the boredom that had clung to his life like a shadow. He had simply been… busy.

 

Before meeting Lisbell, the years, weeks, days, minutes, and seconds had dragged on endlessly, filled with nothing but monotony. It was so dull that he had wondered if the thirty-year mark he had set as the goal for his life’s end might never arrive.

 

But for the past few days, it was as though his life had finally found its rhythm. Time, once incomprehensibly slow, had flown by unnoticed until today.

 

And all his desire centered on one thing.

 

How to bring her back to his side.

 

Truly…

 

When did it begin?

 

When had he stopped feeling the ennui that had so relentlessly eroded his life?

 

“Victor.”

 

“Yes?”

 

“Isn’t it blinding?”

 

“Excuse me? Oh, uh, yes. The sunset is bright.”

 

No.

 

That was not it, Victor.

 

Dropping his cigarette, he clasped his mouth and chuckled, unable to suppress it. A low, stifled laugh escaped him.

 

“I think I finally understand.”

 

“Understand what?”

 

The vivid red light of the sunset blanketed Ulrich’s azure eyes.

 

“You… have never loved someone, have you?”

 

Perhaps this is what you meant when you spoke of love.  

 

These past days, my mind, obsessively preoccupied to the point of suffocation, has plunged into the madness of incomprehension, and perhaps that’s why I’ve ended up like this.

 

But even that raised a question.

 

Why?

 

How can one person’s perspective change so completely, so suddenly?

 

The reality of an emotion I had never felt any fondness for now seems to clear my mind, leaving me strangely relieved. I had dismissed this sensation as petty and insignificant, but—

 

If not this, how else can I explain the sudden disappearance of the ennui that had long drawn me to the edge of death?

 

I must have been enjoying it all along.

 

This unease, this deep, overwhelming, and distasteful pounding, this urgency devoid of leisure.

 

Even if it’s a chilling experience, I must have been enjoying it.

 

If the light Lisbell always clung to, trusted, and relied upon is something akin to this sunset… or this realization that strikes so fiercely, so brilliantly, with a hope close to defiant resolve—

 

If this is what love is… 

 

Ulrich’s blue, no, crimson-stained eyes burned with an intense gleam. They seemed to blaze like a living inferno, magnificent and unstoppable.

“How far along is the search?”

 

Victor suddenly spoke up.

 

Ulrich, feigning calm, easily caught the impatience subtly laced in his tone.

 

He turned to look at his assistant, but the latter was solely focused on Captain Reagan, who had been assigned to oversee this search by the colonel’s orders. Even in his gaze, a hint of unease was evident… something rarely seen from Victor, who was typically unshakably composed.

 

Ulrich recalled the urgent message Victor had just received.

 

“We’ve completed the auction house and shipyard inspections and are now combing through the marketplace.”

 

“How much longer will it take?”

 

“If we find anything in the marketplace, it will end quickly. But if we don’t… we’ll have to move on to the ship area. If it comes to that, it’ll take significantly more time. Every hidden compartment on every vessel will need to be searched. It could take all night.”

 

Captain Reagan explained calmly, but Victor’s expression remained grim.

 

“Victor.”

 

“Yes.”

 

“What’s going on?”

 

“Excuse me?”

 

“There’s a problem, isn’t there?”

 

Victor’s face momentarily faltered, betraying him. It was clear that he could no longer hide the truth. Sighing, he approached Ulrich, who was seated on a wooden crate, and leaned down to whisper.

 

“A message came from the main house.”

 



 

“They’ve issued a summons.”

 

Ulrich’s thin lips curved faintly.

 

A summons?

 

Even during his time in Marnia, this had never happened. A summons was essentially a red alert, a move that reflected both desperation and urgency. That it was being issued now, in this critical moment when Lisbell Osborne was within reach, was a direct message from his mother about how critical the situation had become.

 

But still—a summons?

 

This was a power reserved exclusively for the head of the family, used only against traitors who posed a threat to the household. To invoke it now was a clear indication of how high the stakes were.

 

It was both a measure to protect herself and a declaration of intent to forcibly strip Ulrich of his authority. His mother was determined to prevent this encounter at any cost.

 

“…Ha.”

 

Leaning back, Ulrich exhaled deeply. The long-repressed urge to smoke crept up like a stubborn mold. Running his hand over his face, he looked every bit like a man on the verge of exhaustion. A wry, bitter smile slipped through his features, revealing hints of frustration and disdain.

 

“What should we do?”

 

“What’s the penalty for disobedience?”

 

“The hotel management rights.”

 

“How excessive. Who do you think built the hotel into what it is today?”

 

The Alstad Hotel was one of Ulrich’s crowning achievements. For her to threaten to confiscate it in order to stop him was absurd.

 

At this point, it was almost petty.

 

The situation reeked of stubborn pride—an unwillingness to let things spiral further but also a desperate attempt to salvage her own dignity, no matter how broken.

 

“If you want to defend the management rights, you’ll need to leave immediately.”

 



 

“Sir.”

 

Ulrich’s gaze shifted upward. A lone white seagull cried out as it soared toward the blazing sun, its flight resembling an act of self-sacrifice.

 

Such outdated rules.

 

He had never felt resentment toward the family’s ways before, but now they grated on him.

 

Yet, even so, Ulrich welcomed it.

 

The things that had once seemed hollow and emotionless were now shifting, taking on new meaning. It was all because of her. Lisbell.

 

This change was unfamiliar but exhilarating. He found himself curious—how far would this newfound sensation take him? A quiet, bittersweet desire stirred within him to keep her as an eternal mystery in his heart.

 

“You can’t lose this, sir. You poured everything into bringing the chain strategy from paper to reality.”

 

Victor, standing beside him, was worried solely about the hotel. But Ulrich’s thoughts were elsewhere.

 

He silently watched the soldiers led by Colonel Crackson scour the marketplace.

 

Even if they found her here and brought her back to the estate…

 

Would it solve anything?

 

No.

 

His mother, the pillar of the family, still stood unyielding. Even after shattering his engagement to the Schwaben family to demonstrate his lack of commitment to that relationship, his mother showed no signs of backing down.

 

Taking Lisbell to the estate would lead to the same cycle all over again.

 

“…It’ll just repeat itself.”

 

“In a similar, or perhaps even more maddening, manner.”

 

That was not the result he wanted. Returning with Lisbell under such circumstances would be akin to indulging in foolish stubbornness. It was a pointless endeavor—why initiate something when the outcome was already so predictable?

 

“…Sir?”

 

Victor raised his head to follow Ulrich, who had risen from the wooden crate.

 

Ulrich brushed back his hair, which swayed in the sea breeze. His eyes, fixed on the far-stretching ocean, had darkened to a deeper crimson hue than before.

 

“Call for a retreat.”

 

“Excuse me?”

 

“Let’s head back.”

 

Victor, momentarily stunned, quickly signaled to the captain. The captain, who had been observing the scene with quiet attention, gave simple hand signals to the subordinates standing farther away.

 

Even as this unfolded, Ulrich’s gaze remained locked on the marketplace, where soldiers in uniform bustled about.

 

If she’s there…

 

He wanted to rush over, grab her by the hair, and force her to crawl to him on all fours, sobbing that she’d never try to run again. He wanted to see her fragile, tearful vulnerability as she confessed how hard it had been for her during their time apart.

 

But he knew better than to expect such a sight.

 

She was the type of woman who, even with her resolve repeatedly shattered, always found new light to cling to and hope for. She reminded him of the riotous hues of a dramatic sunset—something that instinctively made him frown yet captivated him nonetheless.

 

His heart pounded relentlessly in his chest, an almost unpleasantly intense rhythm that wouldn’t subside. The thought of turning away from what might be the embodiment of all his whims left him deeply dissatisfied.

 

As he finally turned, he spoke to Victor.

 

“The shareholder rights I inherited from the late Gwen—how much are they worth?”

 

“…Pardon?”

 

“If combined with mine, how much would that make?”

 

“Uh… What? Sir, why are you suddenly—”

 

Victor, caught off guard, instinctively reached for his notebook but couldn’t hide his bewilderment.

 

Ulrich, masking his turbulent emotions with a faint smile, leaned closer and spoke softly to his perplexed aide.

 

“I’m asking how much ownership I need to remove my mother from her position as head of the family.”

 



 

“Hey! Over here!”

 

Bang!

 

Someone kicked the closed warehouse door. Although it wasn’t her body that was struck, Lisbell flinched as if she had been hit herself.

 

“What’s going on?”

 

“The door’s locked.”

 

“Won’t it open?”

 

“Locked from the inside. Someone seems to be holding it shut.”

 

The doorknob began to rattle violently.

 

Voices from outside shouted for the owner and demanded the key to be handed over immediately. The clamor on the other side of the door felt like whiplashes against her nerves. Lisbell, her heart pounding, mustered all her strength to hold the door.

 

Then, the doorknob jiggled. They must have brought the key.

 

No…

 

Lisbell’s eyes welled up with tears.

 

She couldn’t be caught so easily.

 

Frantically, she looked around and spotted a long rod lying in a corner of the warehouse. She quickly let go of the door and grabbed the rod, preparing to strike whoever entered.

 

Her hands, slick with nervous sweat, gripped the rod tightly as she waited. Then, suddenly, the commotion outside came to an abrupt halt.

 

“…What did you say?”

 

“I said retreat!”

 

“What are you talking about?”

 

“We’ve been ordered to withdraw!”

 

“Withdraw?”

 

“Yes!”

 

A small clicking sound of annoyance came from outside, followed by the shadow near the bottom of the door fading away. The heavy, sharp sounds of boots against the ground gradually grew distant.

 

Lisbell watched the scene in a daze, her breath caught in her throat.

 

When the last signs of movement around the door finally disappeared, her trembling hands dropped to her sides.

 

The rod she had been clutching like a lifeline slipped from her grip and rolled into the corner.

 

They were gone…


He just left.

Without opening this door, he simply, simply backed away.

The blood that seemed to have completely drained out through the soles of her feet now finally filled her veins again, as if restoring her once-cold body temperature. Sitting on the spot, Lisbell panted, taking deep breaths.

Tears, which had welled up on her powerless eyelids, streamed down her cheeks.

A beam of light stretched across the narrow storage room. Lisbell followed it with her eyes. Forgotten sunlight shone vividly, as if to restore the warmth of the self she thought had been shattered and broken into pieces.

Rubbing her dazed face with her arm, Lisbell clutched her still-heaving chest, trembling with the aftermath. Taking a deep breath, she placed her hands on the floor to stand up. Grabbing her luggage, she unlocked the door handle.

Carrying the tension that prickled at her throat, she cautiously stepped outside.

As expected, the earlier search commotion had become a hot topic, with people gathered in small groups, chatting animatedly. Fortunately, since the soldiers had searched various shops simultaneously, there wasn’t much attention on this particular storage room. Using their indifference as cover, Lisbell quickly slipped out of the tavern.

Confirming that the group of soldiers in uniform was retreating in the distance, she pulled her hat down low and moved in the opposite direction.

After having a close call with danger, she could no longer roam the shops comfortably. She lingered in the back alleys and corners of the marketplace, enduring until the time for boarding arrived.

Finally, a distant, deep booooom of a ship’s horn echoed.

Oddly enough, there were no further disturbances. The ship, now fully prepared, pulled up its anchor from the depths and spread its white sails wide.

“Departure!”

The booming voice of someone giving the command was accompanied by a whistle that seemed to pierce the heavens. Lisbell watched the gradually receding port of Lenbruck with a gaze filled with suffocating silence.



Saint Alante Monastery was nestled amidst a breathtaking landscape, surrounded by cliffs with endless waterfalls cascading down their rugged faces.

In the age of chaos and disorder marked by ceaseless bloodshed from war, this magnificent cliff had served as a sanctuary for treating patients and hiding people, eventually leading to victory in a long, brutal conflict. It was a place whose sanctity and divinity were proven through history.

The inner chapel, reached after passing through a long corridor, was a cruciform dome carved and modified from rock. Its ornate mosaics and marble decorations along the edges were an indescribable spectacle.

“Miss Osborne, this way.”

Someone called out to Lisbell, who was mesmerized by the serene atmosphere of the chapel, momentarily lost in thought.

Snapping back to reality, she quickly followed the voice.

Since escaping the clutches of Ulrich, divine mercy seemed to have taken a faint hold of her, as things were going surprisingly smoothly.

When she first arrived at the monastery, she was filled with uncertainty. Her mother had lived here, but Lisbell herself had no prior connection to this place.

To come uninvited and ask for help in commemorating her mother’s well-being seemed quite audacious. Even so, clutching guilt and responsibility in either hand, she had barely managed to mention her mother’s name.

Lisbell had even resolved to write to the abbot if direct access was denied. Therefore, being led into the monastery’s premises now felt surreal.

Perhaps it was fortunate that the priest she met at the entrance had been familiar with her mother’s name. At first, there was no reaction to Lisbell Osborne’s introduction. However, upon hearing the name “Helen Osborne” who had once been a nun here, his expression changed subtly, then quickly turned to one of surprise.

“Please wait a moment.”

Politely excusing himself, he had left and returned shortly, informing her that someone wanted to meet her and guiding her into the monastery. It became immediately clear that this was due to traces of her mother’s connection to the place.

“Darien, I’ve brought her.”

The room they arrived at was a small reception room.

The priest stepped aside to let her enter. Lisbell’s gaze naturally shifted to the interior of the reception room.

A person dressed in a white monastic robe with a soft sky-blue veil and a long gold cross hanging from their neck rose slowly to face her. It was clear from their appearance that they were members of the clergy.

“This is Darien, the vice abbot of our monastery.”

The priest explained in a hushed voice. Unsure of how to act, Lisbell hesitated before bowing deeply.

Darien’s calm gaze examined her face intently.

“You look just like Helen.”



“There’s no need to ask further questions.”

Gesturing to the priest with his eyes, Darien motioned to the seat across from him. Lisbell approached and sat down, the sound of the door closing behind the departing priest echoing softly.

The now-silent reception room felt awkwardly still.

That tranquility suddenly felt ominous. While it was true that her mother had once resided here, she had left the place in disgrace after conceiving Lisbell.

After abandoning her aspiration to become a devout servant of God and returning as an apostate, it is uncertain what kind of impression her decision left on the people of this monastery.

If they viewed it negatively…

“…Is Helen doing well?”

Lisbell, who had been staring at the floor uncertainly, suddenly raised her head. She immediately noticed the warmth in Darien’s eyes, akin to the gentle sunlight of spring.

That expression felt as if it reassured her that her decision to come here had been the right one, melting away the tension that had built up within her. Lisbell, her eyes reddened, quickly reached to wipe her face, almost fumbling.

“Well… my mother… passed away recently.”

Her fingers, gripping her luggage, curled inward. Darien was momentarily at a loss for words, then cautiously asked:

“…What happened? Was it an accident?”

“No, it was an illness.”

“I see…”

“Well, that’s part of the reason I came here with a request.”

“A request?”

“Would it be possible to hold my mother’s funeral here?”

“Her funeral hasn’t been held yet?”

“Due to circumstances, we couldn’t conduct the service. And as for her remains… they’re buried in a church near the capital of Rechem.”

“Then why…?”

It seemed he didn’t understand why she was requesting a funeral when the body was already interred.

“I don’t want that place to become the site for remembering my mother. She… didn’t stay in the capital by choice. And I couldn’t properly care for her in her final moments.”



“While she lived with me, my mother often talked about this monastery. She always spoke with such joy and happiness, as though her memories here were incredibly precious. Even though she had to leave because of me, I believe she always carried a longing for this place in her heart.”



“So this place came to mind. If my mother could rest here, I think I, too, would find some peace of mind. I don’t need a grand ceremony for the funeral. A small grave where I can remember her would be enough.”

Lisbell spoke with a voice heavy with tension, barely holding herself together.

“I don’t have her remains to inter, but I do have some personal belongings she left behind.”



“Would that… not be enough?”

Darien, who had remained silent for a while, finally rose from his seat.

“Would you come with me for a moment?”

He led her to a cemetery hidden in the shadow of a sheer cliff, picturesque as if painted.

“This place was once a field hospital during the war. Countless lives lost meaninglessly to the bloodshed of battle were buried here.”



“Now, only those officially affiliated with the monastery or directly connected to its internal affairs may be buried here. That means creating a grave for Helen would be a difficult task.”

So, it was a rejection after all.

Then her attempt at atonement was also…

Her head, heavy with despair, began to droop. But Darien’s next words jolted her back to attention.

“However… I will make it happen.”


“…What?”

Lisbell couldn’t hide her surprise at the unexpected conclusion. Seeing her astonishment, Darien offered a faint smile, as if he completely understood her reaction.

“Helen and I joined the monastery at the same time. On a stormy day, with heavy rain and snow, the two of us were left in baskets at the entrance to this monastery. Perhaps because we were both orphans, knowing neither our parents nor our origins, I’ve always thought of her as my own sister.”

Darien, who had been kneeling in front of a gravestone, slowly stood and turned to face Lisbell. His expression carried the same gentle warmth her mother always showed when reminiscing about the monastery.

“Even though Helen left this place with a child, it doesn’t change how I feel about her.”



“When you walked into the chapel earlier, I felt as though I was seeing a younger version of Helen. I never thought I’d experience such a moment again in my life. It felt like an unexpected, precious gift. Turning you away would leave me with an unforgettable burden.”

“…Is it really possible? Even without my mother’s remains?”

“As I mentioned earlier, this place was once a battlefield. Many of those buried here were interred not with intact remains but with mementos such as dog tags or other belongings, as their bodies were too damaged or missing.”



“If you have Helen’s belongings, that will suffice. The merciful God understands and watches over everything, no matter how it is done.”

A wave of warmth surged through her chest. The knot that had been tied so tightly within her finally began to loosen, as if breaking free. It was a burden that might have weighed on her for the rest of her life if not for this moment.

“Thank you… truly, thank you so much.”

Lisbell bowed deeply, repeatedly expressing her gratitude. Darien lightly patted her shoulder in reassurance.

“Come to think of it, we haven’t introduced ourselves properly. I’m Darien Faye. And you are…?”

“I’m Lisbell Osborne.”

“Osborne.”

Darien repeated the surname, inherited from her mother, with a voice full of vivid nostalgia. Lisbell quickly wiped away her tears with the back of her hand, letting out a deep breath of relief.

Here, it was okay.

She felt she could finally let her mother go in peace.



Darien took charge of all the preparations necessary for the funeral. Thanks to his position as a sub-prior, he managed to streamline many of the formalities that might otherwise have been difficult.

As he had mentioned, Helen wasn’t an officially recognized member of the monastery anymore, so Lisbell had to remain discreet to avoid drawing unnecessary attention.

“Lisbell.”

Standing by the window, gazing at the picturesque view, Lisbell turned at the sound of her name. Darien was standing there, holding a tray of food.

“Am I interrupting your thoughts?”

“No, it’s fine.”

In truth, she had been anxiously watching the horizon, unable to shake the unease that had risen with the morning sun.

It felt as if the monstrous man who haunted her thoughts might storm into the monastery at any moment. But knowing that he would have to cross a vast ocean to reach her eased her fear slightly.

With her mind somewhat calmed, Lisbell clumsily voiced a question that had been buried deep within her amidst the chaos.

“They’ve issued an order to retreat.”

“Retreat?”

The men who had stormed the harbor that day were undoubtedly Ulrich’s soldiers. They had scoured every corner, searching for a woman, blocking roads and rummaging through the marketplace. There was no question they were acting under his orders.

But why the sudden withdrawal?

Whatever the reason, it must have been dictated by Ulrich himself. Perhaps he had decided to give up on finding her. Or maybe something else had happened.

Not knowing what led to her narrow escape frustrated her. While she was lost in thought, Darien appeared.

When she tried to take the tray from him, Darien shook his head and gestured toward the table instead.

“Did you sleep well last night?”

“Yes, very much so. It’s so peaceful here.”

“Being far from the city, it’s naturally quieter.”

“I didn’t expect you to give me a room to stay in. Thank you for your kindness.”

Darien smiled softly as he uncovered the dishes on the tray.

“This room was the one Helen used during her time as a nun.”

“Oh, so it was my mother’s…”

“The lack of new entrants last quarter may be part of the reason, but I’ve also been selfishly trying to keep this room vacant as much as possible. This place holds so many memories for me.”

It was clear that Darien had no problem letting someone stay here for a night, and even more so if that someone was Helen’s daughter, a sharer of those precious memories.

Whenever Lisbell sensed Darien’s goodwill toward her, a quiet warmth spread through her chest.

There was no hidden agenda or malice in Darien’s demeanor, which eased Lisbell’s wariness.

Yet, every time she faced this unfamiliar kindness, something surged up from her core—a hot and aching lump. Lisbell recognized it as the rare warmth of human connection, something she hadn’t felt in a long time. It reminded her of the uncalculated care and generosity she once took for granted when she was with her mother or Theodore.

Indeed, distancing herself from that man had been the right decision.

Only after losing him had she begun to regain what she had unwittingly forfeited. Slowly but surely, the ordinary, everyday moments of life that his suffocating presence had eroded were returning.

She hoped that these fragile fragments of normalcy would continue uninterrupted.

“After breakfast, let’s head to the cemetery together,” Darien said.

“Is everything ready?”

“Yes. Given the circumstances, only another priest and I will be present. It will be a quiet farewell.”

That was more than enough. The thought of finally being able to pray for her mother’s peace filled Lisbell with resolve as she picked up her cutlery.

After breakfast, Lisbell followed Darien to the cemetery. In a discreet corner where no one would notice, a new gravestone and a small burial pit had been prepared.

“Darien,” called a priest, who had previously guided Lisbell into the monastery grounds. He was holding a rectangular wooden box, and Lisbell immediately knew that it contained her mother’s belongings, which she had entrusted to Darien.

The funeral proceeded simply, with only the two clergy members.

After the box was placed in the ground, soil was gently shoveled over it, filling the pit. A few drops of holy water were sprinkled over the pristine gravestone. The water trickled down, soaking into the earth below. Darien closed his eyes and recited a prayer, pledging peace and farewell.

Unlike the one-sided goodbye at the Portley Church, this truly felt like a proper farewell for her mother.

Yet, as Lisbell watched the process, a complex emotion overcame her.

She felt a lightness, as if a burden she had carried for so long had finally been lifted, but there was also a deep sorrow. It struck her that this was the process of truly becoming alone.

Even though her guilt had been a heavy weight, it had also been a strange source of comfort—keeping her mother alive in her thoughts.

But now, with everything laid to rest, she realized that neither Theodore nor her mother remained by her side.

She was alone.

Completely and utterly alone.

Being alone meant being treated as an outsider no matter where she went. That was what her life would be from now on. Though she hadn’t yet faced such a situation directly, the thought of becoming a solitary wanderer left her feeling hollow.

“Where will you go now? Back to your hometown?”

It was as if Darien had sensed her loneliness. Lisbell hesitated before slowly shaking her head.

“No. I’m not going back to Reckem.”

“Then…?”

“…I don’t know.”



“Where should I go?”

Darien’s expression turned curious. She didn’t know the full story, so it was natural for her to find Lisbell’s aimlessness odd.

But Lisbell truly felt lost. She muttered almost as if she were leaning on the God she believed in.

“There was someone I loved… but I hurt him deeply, and we parted ways. My mother is no longer here either.”



“So… I don’t even know what’s left for me anymore.”

“…Lisbell. Do you have nowhere to go?”

Lisbell blinked slowly, her eyelids trembling with a dull ache each time they closed.

She felt relief, but also unease.

Everyone said the world was vast, but that didn’t seem to apply to her.

Why was it that she had nowhere to go?

“If that’s the case, have you ever considered joining the monastery?”

“…What?”

“As a nun, here in this monastery.”

For a moment, she thought it was just an impulsive suggestion meant to console her. But when their eyes met, she saw that Darien’s offer was genuine. Her gaze locked with his steady, unyielding eyes, and she spoke without thinking.

“…How much can religion truly protect me?”


“What do you mean by ‘protect’?”

“I mean, if someone tried to forcibly take me away from here, would it be possible to stop them?”

A profound expression crossed Darian’s face as she studied Lisbell’s features, as though trying to discern the underlying unease behind her words.

“…I’m not entirely sure what specific situation you’re referring to, but once someone is admitted into the monastery, they’re protected by the vow of lifelong devotion. Unless they choose to break that vow or renounce their faith, no one can easily interfere with them. It’s akin to a religious oath. In this country, such autonomy is inviolable.”

Before meeting him, Lisbell had lived in a world where such protections seemed a given. A world where rights weren’t so easily crushed by wealth, family influence, or power.

But… the world she had known and this place were different.

Religion, after all, was not a system dictated solely by capital. It was a sanctuary of miracles and divine intervention, a refuge where even the unsolvable brought people crawling to their knees before God.

Lisbell reflected on the incident at the harbor marketplace.

When the soldiers had stormed in for an unexpected inspection, only to leave without opening the locked warehouse, she had felt a deep relief. It was as if a slender thread of salvation had come from the very God who had always seemed to turn a blind eye to her.

Perhaps the man’s unpredictable change of behavior back then was divine intervention. Or maybe the capriciousness itself had been God’s hand at work.

What was certain was that whatever light had guided her through those moments had also brought her safely to this place. The warmth of that sensation was so sweet that it tempted her into thinking that maybe this was destiny—a comforting delusion of causality.

After all, if not here, where else could she go?

Even Darian’s current attitude seemed like a stroke of fortune. The way she so readily offered Lisbell a safe haven for no reason other than her connection to her mother wasn’t something to take lightly.

Lisbell wanted to surrender herself to that warmth.

Here, with Darian and in this place that finally let her feel the kindness of humanity again after so long…

Perhaps even this was a testament to God’s mercy.

A sign that He would no longer turn away from her.

How many times had she been crushed, tormented, and imprisoned under the man’s cruel whims, desperately praying for a God who might save her? If this was the fulfillment of that longing, Lisbell could not bring herself to refuse it.

“Could you give me some time to think about it?”

It was a decision that required careful consideration—whether to bind herself to religion for the rest of her life. Darian, seemingly not expecting an immediate answer, nodded in understanding.

Yet, by the time Lisbell returned to her room that evening, she had already made her choice.

For others, the life of a cloistered monk might seem stifling, but for her, that very confinement was a necessity. The restricted scope of movement and the sanctuary’s inviolability would serve as a protective shield.

That night, Lisbell borrowed a pair of scissors from a priest. Standing in front of the mirror, she cut off her waist-length hair. The wavy strands of gray tumbled to the floor, scattering like brittle leaves.

She thought of it as a symbolic act—a ritual of sorts. A way to sever herself from the monster that had thrived on her despair, leaving only its remnants behind.

A silent prayer accompanied the act, a desperate plea for the monster to be sated and finally leave her.



“Bell! Here you are!”

She was staring at the large cross mounted on the altar when she heard the familiar voice, accompanied by the sound of the chapel door opening and closing.

Lisbell turned her gaze toward the speaker, unclasping her hands as she did. Standing there, smiling warmly, was a woman about her age dressed in the same attire—a fellow nun named Delilah who had joined the monastery last quarter.

“Was it your turn to clean the chapel today?”

When pledging herself to the monastery, Lisbell had been given the option to choose a name. Most chose a baptismal name instead of their given name, and Lisbell had done the same. “Bell” was the baptismal name she had received through Darian. Perhaps because it was derived from the latter part of her original name, it didn’t feel unfamiliar.

“No, it’s Sonya’s turn.”

At Lisbell’s reply, Delilah narrowed her eyes knowingly.

“So you just came here on your own again? I wondered where you disappeared to right after lunch. Do you like the chapel that much?”

Lisbell smiled faintly and walked toward Delilah, glancing back at the altar.

The cross, adorned with a few unwavering candles, reflected refracted light, giving it a soft glow.

Ever since she had stumbled upon this sight, Lisbell had found herself returning to the chapel whenever she had time.

Unlike Delilah or Sonya, her circumstances were different. The silent unease planted within her churned in her stomach like dark, turbulent waters.

But whenever she sat in the calming atmosphere of the chapel and gazed at the large cross, she felt a semblance of peace returning, as though the chaos within her was soothed.

And though that solace was fleeting, it was solace nonetheless.

「To live as one consecrated to God alone.」

Before entering the monastery, the petition vow handed to her by the priest contained that phrase.

Celibacy.

While the term could be open to interpretation depending on the context, Lisbell immediately grasped what it meant in the monastery’s expectations.

It signified a body that had not lost its purity.

The formation process leading up to the lifelong vow was meant to shape an individual into a devout servant of God.

Thus, any external sexual stimuli were strictly denied and deemed corrupt. Lisbell’s mother had been exiled for violating this principle, hadn’t she?

After a brief hesitation, Lisbell signed the document as if nothing were wrong. Almost involuntarily, her mind vehemently rejected the implication.

It was assault. What I lost wasn’t purity but autonomy.

The act with Ulrich wasn’t something that could ever be called intimacy or lovemaking. To attach such words to it felt like a profanation in itself.

She could not, would not, accept that she was defiled by that act. When her thoughts reached that point, it was almost out of sheer defiance that she completed her signature. Matters of such physical nature were deeply private, and as long as she kept silent, no one would find out. With nowhere else to go, Lisbell clung to this loophole to remain in the monastery.

Yet she couldn’t completely ignore the discomfort weighing on her heart.

This was, after all, a promise to God.

The thought that her falsehood might one day be exposed and lead to her being mercilessly cast out haunted her relentlessly.

For that reason, she found herself drawn to the chapel whenever she had the chance. She would stare at the cross, seeking solace and subtly confessing her inner turmoil. It was less a confession and more a self-justification—a desperate bid to ease her conscience. Without such acts, she feared she would be consumed by guilt and despair.

“Let’s go. The afternoon schedule is about to begin.”

Delilah’s voice brought her back to reality. Nodding, Lisbell tore her gaze from the cross and followed her.

“Today, we’re in charge of cleaning the common room.”

Life in the monastery was divided into two main aspects: adapting to the communal environment and studying religious doctrine.

The former required rigorous education in cooperation and responsibility, as living together necessitated shared duties. Cleaning and maintaining the monastery grounds fell into this category. Yesterday, Lisbell and Sonya had spent the morning washing all the bedding from their dormitory.

“Aren’t you coming?”

Although Delilah mentioned the common room, her steps didn’t lead in that direction, prompting Lisbell to react with curiosity. Delilah, who had paused to admire the blossoming white fringe trees heralding spring, shrugged her shoulders.

“They said a guest is visiting today. I thought we should take our time since they might not be finished yet.”

“A guest?”

“Sir Philip.”

Lisbell tilted her head at the mention of the name as she inhaled the faint fragrance of the tree branch Delilah had handed her.

“Sir Philip? Didn’t he visit just last week?”

Seemingly understanding her confusion, Delilah replied in a matter-of-fact tone.

“Yes. Bell, you wouldn’t know this since you’re new, but Sir Philip is a frequent guest here. His family has been devout for generations, and they make substantial donations to the monastery every quarter. He’s practically a treasured patron here.”

Delilah added that such a distinguished guest’s visit shouldn’t be disturbed. Though her explanation was thorough, it didn’t entirely satisfy Lisbell’s curiosity. Something still felt unclear.

“But today isn’t even a day for regular worship,” Lisbell remarked.

What business could an external guest have at the monastery on a non-worship day? Sir Philip’s reason for visiting remained a mystery.

Delilah sighed lightly before continuing.

“He’s here to receive prayers from the priest. Or sometimes to offer them himself.”

“Prayers…?”

“Sir Philip has a young daughter who’s been battling a congenital illness since birth.”

 It was an unexpected story, and it surprised her a little.

“Oh, his daughter…”

“Yes, we only found out recently. From what I heard, the family doctor gave her a terminal diagnosis a long time ago, but Sir Philip’s daughter has lived far beyond the life expectancy the doctor mentioned at the time.”



“Sir Philip seems to consider it a blessing from God, which is why he’s been visiting more frequently than before.”

Lisbell understood. Few people could empathize with the pain of a family’s suffering better than she could. She had carried the burden of guilt and responsibility like a stain ingrained in her, unable to let go of it, which had led her to this place. She could completely relate to Sir Philip’s desperate efforts, even to the point of seeking solace in religion.

“Shall we head out now?”

Brushing aside the cluster of white petals that had fallen from the tree branch, Delilah turned toward the common room. When the two of them arrived, the timing seemed perfect, as the door that had been closed moments earlier opened just as they reached it. Straightening her posture and bowing her head, Delilah greeted the departing figures. Lisbell followed suit beside her.

Trailing behind Darian, a stranger’s face caught Lisbell’s eye.

Tall, with a thin and wiry frame. His lips carried a gentle smile, but his complexion was shrouded in a subtle gloom that seeped into every corner of his demeanor. Despite his somber aura, his attire was strikingly elegant and refined.

Lisbell instantly recognized him as Sir Philip, the man with a sickly daughter.

“What brings you here?” Darian asked, turning to the two of them. Delilah responded politely.

“Bell and I are assigned to clean the common room today.”

“I see. This is Sir Philip. Both of you, greet him.”

They bowed courteously, and Sir Philip returned the gesture with the noble smile characteristic of his status. After a brief exchange, he followed Darian and walked away.

Lisbell’s gaze lingered on his retreating figure a little longer than necessary.

“Bell! What are you doing?”

Delilah’s voice snapped her out of her reverie, and she quickly replied, “Coming,” before stepping into the common room. As she walked, Sir Philip’s image floated in her mind.

It was a face that evoked a sharp sense of déjà vu.

It wasn’t a matter of having seen him somewhere before. No, it was the expression itself—one that appeared composed on the surface but was painfully worn and hollow within. It reminded her of someone she had seen in the mirror while caring for her mother in Marnia.

It reminded her of herself, her past self.

She saw in Sir Philip a reflection of who she used to be.

Of course, recognizing this did not mean she could do anything about it. But the flood of raw memories he stirred up brought with it a sense of kinship and empathy, uncovering a wound she thought she had buried under layers of resolve.

Having a sick family member is a heavy burden.

It made perfect sense why Sir Philip visited the monastery so often, enough for the sisters to recognize him. He was clinging to whatever he could for hope, desperate enough to offer even his soul if it meant relief.

Who loves more deeply? A parent for their child, or a child for their parent?

Lisbell dismissed the thought as a pointless question, joining Delilah in cleaning the common room. At the time, she assumed her fleeting encounter with Sir Philip was the end of it.

So when she later found him alone in the chapel, she was taken aback.

It was a time when there were no regular services. Lisbell had never seen anyone else during her quiet visits for reflection. Thus, when she opened the door and noticed an unfamiliar figure seated in the middle of the pews, she froze for a moment.

At first, she didn’t recognize him as Sir Philip. She merely thought he was someone, like her, seeking a fragment of peace.

Then, faint sobbing began to rise, muffled and restrained, but audible nonetheless.

Lisbell, seated a few rows behind him, didn’t need to crane her neck to confirm the source. The man’s once-straight shoulders had slumped, and his upright posture had collapsed. He was crying silently, as if carrying the weight of a deeply personal sorrow. His whispered prayers rippled through the still air of the chapel.

She didn’t need to see his face to know who he was. The image of his melancholic expression from earlier came vividly to mind. Remembering his frequent visits to the monastery erased any doubt.

She could also guess the content of his tearful prayer.

He must be pleading for his daughter’s life.

It was no different from when she clung to each line of scripture, wishing desperately for her mother to open her eyes.

Feeling uneasy, Lisbell stood up earlier than usual, intending to leave him in peace.

But she didn’t make it far before stopping. Hesitating, she reached into her pocket and pulled out a handkerchief she always carried just in case. Weaving between the pews, she cautiously approached him.

As she got closer, she confirmed that it was indeed Sir Philip. So engrossed in his emotions, he didn’t even notice her presence. Lisbell hesitated briefly before opening her mouth to speak gently.

“Um…”

He startled and opened his eyes, which were brimming with tears. The intricate colors of the chapel, refracted through the mosaic windows, illuminated the deep sorrow pooled in his expression.

Lisbell hesitated, unsure of what to say, and ultimately chose to stay silent as she extended the handkerchief.

Sir Philip, clearly taken aback, accepted it with a slightly bewildered look. A moment later, he seemed to realize the gesture was meant to comfort him. Lowering his gaze, he let out a long sigh, heavy with unspoken emotions. Even his breath carried traces of lingering sadness.

“Thank you. I’ve shown you an unsightly side of myself.”

“It’s nothing.”

Using the handkerchief to wipe away the tears on his cheek, Sir Philip glanced at her briefly.

Soon, his gaze shifted, becoming more inquisitive.

“I am Philip Winchester. I’ve been visiting this monastery for many years, but I don’t recall seeing your face before.”

Though they had briefly exchanged greetings earlier, it was likely too fleeting for him to remember her. Lisbell thought it reasonable and responded calmly.

“I recently joined under Lord Darian’s recommendation.”

“And your name is?”

“…Bell.”

When introducing herself, she often found her full name, “Lisbell” almost slipping out. Only after a moment’s pause did she manage to offer the appropriate response.

Sir Philip nodded and fell silent for a moment before asking another question.

“Did you overhear my prayer?”

“No. I only heard… the sound of your sorrowful crying and came to check.”

He gave a faint, bitter smile.

“At my age, crying like this in front of others is hardly dignified. Yet, I can’t seem to help it. Whenever I come before God and speak, it feels as though the reins holding me together unravel completely. I have a sick daughter, you see. Thinking of her feels as though my heart is being torn apart.”

Although she already knew of his circumstances, Lisbell decided it was better to remain quiet and simply listen.

“Bell, you see…”



“I would do anything—absolutely anything—if it meant my daughter could live a better life. If she could go outside, bask in the sunlight, and run freely, I’d give everything I have to make it happen.”



“That’s how desperately I wish for it.”

Lisbell hesitated, her lips moving wordlessly for a few moments before she finally mustered the courage to speak.

“…I understand.”



“My mother was gravely ill as well.”

She refrained from adding that, unlike Sir Philip, she had lacked the power or resources to do anything about it. She couldn’t afford to make significant donations to the monastery, couldn’t frequent this place as if it were her home, or plead with God for a miracle. All she could do was endure, suffering under the whims of the man who loomed over her life, with no means to fight back.

Even though it was now a part of her distant past, the mere memory of it left a bitter taste in her mouth.

“So… I sincerely hope your daughter regains her health.”

He didn’t say anything in response. Concerned that she might have said something wrong, Lisbell carefully studied his expression, but it didn’t seem that way. Rather, it felt as though he was at a loss for words—or perhaps his throat had tightened.

It seemed her words, her shared experience, had resonated with him on a profound level.

This wasn’t mere human sympathy; it was a deep, bone-deep connection born from shared pain.

----

Continue in Part 5
